Utah statutes.
62A-4a-707.   Executive -- Authority.

As used in Article VII of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, "executive" means the executive director of the department. The executive director is authorized to appoint a compact administrator in accordance with the terms of Article VII of the compact.

